District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Sexual Harassment Investigation Integrity Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 303 of The District of Columbia Human Rights Act of 1977, effective
December 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 2-38, D.C. Official Code § 2-1401.01), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:


“(a) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, The Mayor shall establish rules of
procedure for the investigation, conciliation, and hearing of administrative complaints filed
against District government agencies, officials and employees alleging violations of this chapter.
The final administrative determination in such matters shall be made by the Mayor or his
designee.”
(b) A new subsection (c) is added to read as follows:
“(c) (1) Investigations of a formal or informal complaint of harassment or other unlawful
discriminatory practice by a District government employee shall be referred to the Inspector
General if the alleged perpetrator, at the time of the alleged incident or at the time of the
complaint, serves in one of the following capacities:
“(A) A mayoral appointee of any subordinate agency, board, or
commission, as defined by the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-
142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01);
“(B) The Director of a non-subordinate agency; or,
“(C) Any Career, Educational, Legal, Excepted, or Management
Supervisory Services employee who reports directly to the Mayor or City Administrator.
“(2) The Inspector General shall hire and retain independent counsel to conduct
prompt investigations into any complaints referred pursuant to paragraph (1), and to produce a
report of findings.
“(A) Independent counsel hired and retained by the Inspector General
pursuant to this subsection shall have experience in confidentiality and sexual harassment law,
including litigation and mediation.”
“(3) Investigations referred to the Inspector General, in addition to encompassing


the direct scope of the complaint, shall include an assessment of whether any District
government resources were expended in the course of any unlawful discriminatory practice, and
whether workplace culture, management procedures, or other broader factors contributed to any
unlawful discriminatory practice.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.